Vermont, session 2025-2026, H128.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4252a is amended to read:
§ 4252a. UNLAWFUL DRUG ACTIVITY IN A DWELLING; FLASH
VT LEG #379852 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.128
2025 Page 2 of 2
CITATION
(a) Except for good cause shown, a person cited or arrested for dispensing
or selling a regulated drug in violation of this chapter shall be arraigned on the
next business day after the citation or arrest if the alleged illegal activity
occurred at a dwelling where the person is not a legal tenant.
(b) Unless the person is held without bail for another offense, the State’s
Attorney may shall request conditions of release. The court may include as a
condition of release that the person is prohibited from coming within a fixed
distance of the dwelling.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379852 v.1